Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB79.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 335B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each licensing authority listed in subsection (4) of this section shall collect the
following data using a data collection application, during the annual, biennial, or
triennial licensure renewal process:
(a) Licensee's personal information, including but not limited to:
1. The licensee's first, middle, and last name;
2. Email address and phone number;
3. Physical address of all practice locations;
4. License type;
5. License number and date of issuance;
6. License expiration; and
7. National Provider Identifier number; and
(b) Workforce participation information, including but not limited to:
1. Degree level or certificates completed;
2. Employment type;
3. Employment specialty;
4. Employment setting;
5. Employment status, including but not limited to:
a. Actively employed in respective field;
b. Actively employed in a clinical setting, either in person or
through telehealth, or both;
c. Actively employed outside of respective field;
d. Unemployed but seeking work in respective field; or
e. Unemployed but not seeking work in respective field;
Page 1 of 3
HB007910.100 - 491 - XXXX 2/27/2025 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 79/GA
6. Reason for unemployment; and
7. Ability to meet patient needs of those covered under the Federal
Americans with Disabilities Act.
(2) Data collected in subsection (1) of this section shall not include a licensee's
Social Security number.
(3) Licensees may notify the licensing authority if the licensee wishes to decline the
use of data collected in subsection (1)(a) of this section to be made available to
other employers or agencies for free or for purchase.
(4) The following licensing authorities are subject to the requirements of this section:
(a) Professional licensure boards as defined in KRS 211.332;
(b) Kentucky Board for Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy established in
KRS 311B.030;
(c) State Board of Podiatry established in KRS 311.410; and
(d) Kentucky Department for Public Health, in regards to community health
workers certified under KRS 309.462.
(5) Each licensing authority listed in subsection (4) of this section shall report as
necessary, and upon request, the data collected in subsection (1) of this section to
the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics established in KRS 151B.132 and
the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for workforce capacity and workforce
reporting and tracking purposes.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335.300 TO 335.399 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall grant licensure under KRS 335.330 to an applicant who:
(a) Holds an active license from another state to practice as an independent
marriage and family therapist;
(b) Is in good standing with the certifying or licensing board of that state;
(c) Is of good moral character;
Page 2 of 3
HB007910.100 - 491 - XXXX 2/27/2025 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 79/GA
(d) Has not had disciplinary actions of a serious nature brought against him or
her by a registration, certification, or licensing board or agency;
(e) Has met the examination requirement set out in KRS 335.330(3); and
(f) Has paid the application fee to the board.
(2) The applicant shall be exempt from:
(a) The required education set out in KRS 335.330(1); and
(b) The required hours of supervised experience in the practice of marriage and
family therapy set out in KRS 335.330(2).
(3) If the board identifies any technical error in the application:
(a) The board shall notify the applicant of the error within one (1) week of its
discovery;
(b) The applicant shall correct the error within two (2) weeks; and
(c) The board shall review the correction within one (1) week of the submitted
correction.
(4) The board shall issue the license within two (2) weeks of the date the application
is complete.
Section 3. Each licensing authority required to collect data in Section 1 of this
Act shall have until the licensing authority's next licensure renewal date following the
effective date of this Act to comply.
Section 4. Section 1 of this Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Page 3 of 3
HB007910.100 - 491 - XXXX 2/27/2025 2:41 PM GA